Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 43.43.580 (Firearms background check programâAutomated firearms background check systemâFee) and 2024 c 289 s 7, 2022 c 105 s 7, & 2020 c 28 s 1;(2) RCW 43.43.585 (Washington background check advisory board) and 2020 c 28 s 2;(3) RCW 43.43.590 (State firearms background check system account) and 2020 c 28 s 3;(4) RCW 9.41.1135 (Firearms sales or transfersâUse of Washington state patrol firearms background check system) and 2023 c 161 s 9 & 2020 c 28 s 4;(5) 2020 c 28 s 5;(6) 2020 c 28 s 6;(7) 2020 c 28 s 7;(8) 2020 c 28 s 8;(9) 2020 c 28 s 9 (uncodified);(10) 2020 c 28 s 10 (uncodified);(11) 2024 c 289 s 4; and(12) 2024 c 289 s 6.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---